Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.345.030

Powers of association.

The school directors' association shall have the power:

(1) To prepare and adopt, amend, and repeal a constitution, rules and regulations, and bylaws for its own organization including county or regional units, for its government and guidance, for the election of state board of education members, and for educational service district elections: PROVIDED, That action taken with respect thereto is consistent with the provisions of this chapter or with other provisions of law;

(2) To arrange for and call such meetings of the association or of the officers and committees thereof as are deemed essential to the performance of its duties;

(3) To provide for the compensation of members of the board of directors in accordance with RCW 43.03.240, and for payment of travel and subsistence expenses incurred by members and/or officers of the association and association staff while engaged in the performance of duties under direction of the association in the manner provided by RCW 28A.320.050;

(4) To employ an executive director and other staff and pay such employees out of the funds of the association;

(5) To conduct studies and disseminate information therefrom relative to increased efficiency in local school board administration;

(6) To buy, lease, sell, or exchange such personal and real property as necessary for the efficient operation of the association and to borrow money, issue deeds of trust or other evidence of indebtedness, or enter into contracts for the purchase, lease, remodeling, or equipping of office facilities or the acquisition of sites for such facilities;

(7) To purchase liability insurance for school directors, which insurance may indemnify said directors against any or all liabilities for personal or bodily injuries and property damage arising from their acts or omissions while performing or while in good faith purporting to perform their official duties as school directors;

(8) To provide advice and assistance to local boards to promote their primary duty of representing the public interest;

(9) Upon request by a local school district board(s) of directors, to make available on a cost reimbursable contract basis (a) specialized services, (b) research information, and (c) consultants to advise and assist district board(s) in particular problem areas: PROVIDED, That such services, information, and consultants are not already available from other state agencies, educational service districts, or from the information and research services authorized by RCW 28A.320.110.

[ 2022 c 79 s 2; 1991 c 66 s 1; 1990 c 33 s 372; 1989 c 325 s 1; 1983 c 187 s 1; 1979 c 151 s 13; 1974 ex.s. c 101 s 1; 1969 ex.s. c 184 s 4; 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28A.61.030. Prior: 1947 c 169 s 3; Rem. Supp. 1947 s 4709-22. Formerly RCW 28A.61.030, 28.58.340.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1989 c 325: "This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and shall take effect June 30, 1989." [ 1989 c 325 s 3.]